ko: 호환 조립식 장난감 시스템: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; 독점(브랜드 전용); 범용/멀티 시스템; 목재 기차 트랙; 기타
vi: Hệ thống đồ chơi lắp ráp tương thích: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Độc quyền (dành riêng cho thương hiệu); Đa năng/đa hệ thống; Đường ray xe lửa bằng gỗ; Khác
pt-PT: Sistema de brinquedo de construção compatível: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Exclusivo (específico da marca); Universal/multissistema; Pista de comboios de madeira; Outro
it: Sistema di costruzioni compatibile: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Proprietario (specifico del brand); Universale/multisistema; Binario del treno in legno; Altro
sv: Kompatibelt byggleksakssystem: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Tillverkarspecifikt (märkesspecifikt); Universellt/multisystem; Tågbana i trä; Annat
de: Kompatibles Bauspielsystem: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Proprietär (markenspezifisch); Universal/Multi-System; Holzeisenbahn; Sonstige
el: Συμβατό σύστημα παιχνιδιών κατασκευής: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Ιδιόκτητο (ειδικό για τη μάρκα); Γενικής χρήσης/πολλαπλών συστημάτων; Ξύλινη ράγα τρένου; Άλλο
ja: 互換性のある組み立ておもちゃシステム: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; 独自規格 (ブランド専用); 汎用 / マルチシステム; 木製レール; その他
sk-SK: Kompatibilný systém stavebných hračiek: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Proprietárne (špecifické pre značku); Univerzálne/viacsystémové; Drevená vláčikodráha; Iné
da: Kompatibelt byggesystem for legetøj: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Navnebeskyttet (mærkespecifik); Universal/multisystem; Togbane i træ; Andet
bg-BG: Съвместима система за конструктори: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Собствена (специфична за марката); Универсална/за много системи; Дървена влакова релса; Друго
sl-SI: Združljiv sistem gradbenih kock: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Lastniško (specifično za blagovno znamko); Univerzalno/večsistemsko; Lesena železniška proga; Drugo
en: Compatible building toy system: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Proprietary (brand-specific); Universal/multi-system; Wooden train track; Other
th: ระบบตัวต่อของเล่นที่เข้ากันได้: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; กรรมสิทธิ์ (เฉพาะแบรนด์); อเนกประสงค์/หลายระบบ; รางรถไฟไม้; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 适配的积木玩具系统: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; 专有（特定品牌）; 通用/多系统; 木制火车轨道; 其他
pt-BR: Sistema de brinquedos de montagem compatível: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Exclusivo (específico da marca); Universal/multissistema; Pista de trem de madeira; Outro
ru: Совместимая система строительного конструктора: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Проприетарная (специфичная для бренда); Универсальная/мультисистемная; Деревянная железная дорога; Другое
hu: Kompatibilis építőjáték-rendszer: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Saját (márkaspecifikus); Univerzális/többrendszeres; Fa vonatsín; Egyéb
es: Sistema de juguetes de construcción compatible: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Patentado (específico de la marca); Universal/multisistema; Vía de tren de madera; Otro
nb: Kompatibelt byggelekesystem: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Proprietær (merkespesifikk); Universell / flere systemer; Togbane i tre; Annet
fi: Yhteensopiva rakennuslelujärjestelmä: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Omistusoikeudellinen (brändikohtainen); Universaali/monijärjestelmä; Puinen junarata; Muu
ro-RO: Sistem de jucării de construcție compatibil: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Deținut (specific mărcii); Universal/multi-sistem; Șină de tren din lemn; Altele
pl: Kompatybilny system klocków konstrukcyjnych: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Zastrzeżony (specyficzny dla marki); Uniwersalny/wielosystemowy; Drewniane tory kolejowe; Inne
tr: Uyumlu yapı oyuncağı sistemi: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Özel (markaya özel); Evrensel/çoklu sistem; Ahşap tren rayı; Diğer
hr-HR: Kompatibilni sustav igračaka za gradnju: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Vlasnički (specifično za robnu marku); Univerzalno / više sustava; Drvene tračnice za vlak; Ostalo
cs: Kompatibilní systém stavebnic: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Chráněné (specifické pro značku); Univerzální / více systémů; Dřevěná vláčkodráha; Jiné
zh-TW: 相容積木玩具系統: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; 專有 (特定品牌); 通用/多系統; 木製火車軌道; 其他
fr: Système de jeu de construction compatible: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Propriétaire (spécifique à la marque); Universel / multi-système; Circuit de train en bois; Autre
lt-LT: Suderinama konstravimo žaislų sistema: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Nuosavybinė (specifinė prekės ženklui); Universali / kelių sistemų; Medinių traukinių trasa; Kita
nl: Compatibel bouwspeelgoedsysteem: BRIO; Connetix; Gravitrax; Hot Wheels; K'NEX; LEGO; LEGO DUPLO; Magna-Tiles; Mega Bloks; Playmobil; Eigen (merkspecifiek); Universeel/meerdere systemen; Houten treinbaan; Overig